Utah statutes.
31A-22-1411.   Incontestability period.

(1)  For a policy or certificate that has been in force for less than six months, an insurer may rescind a long-term care insurance policy or certificate upon a showing of misrepresentation that is material to the acceptance for coverage.

(2)  For a policy or certificate that has been in force for at least six months but less than two years, an insurer may rescind a long-term care insurance policy or certificate upon a showing of misrepresentation that:

(a)  is material to the acceptance for coverage; and

(b)  pertains to the condition for which benefits are sought.

